Utah statutes.
20A-1-401.   Interpretation of election laws -- Computation of time.
(1)  Courts and election officers shall construe the provisions of Title 20A,
Election Code, liberally to carry out the intent of this title.
(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays
shall be included in all computations of days made under the provisions of
Title 20A, Election Code.
(3)  Unless otherwise specifically provided for under this Title 20A:
(a)  when computing any number of days before or after a specified date or
event under this Title 20A, the specified date or day of the event shall not
be included in the count; and
(b) (i)  if the commencement date of a time period preceding a specified date
or event falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the following business
day shall be used;
(ii)  if the last day of a time period following a specified date or event
falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the time period shall be
extended to the following business day; and
(iii)  if a deadline that falls before or after a specified date or event
falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the deadline shall be
considered to fall on the following business day.
